Utah statutes.
59-2-1357.   Redemption at foreclosure sale.

Any person interested in any real estate sold at foreclosure sale under any decree has the same right to redeem the real estate from the sale, within the same time and upon the same terms as if the sale had been made upon execution.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

